Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.511

Dissenter's estimate of fair value—Notice.

(1) A dissenter may notify the limited liability company in writing of the dissenter's own estimate of the fair value of the dissenter's interest in the limited liability company, and amount of interest due, and demand payment of the dissenter's estimate, less any payment under RCW 25.15.501, if:

(a) The dissenter believes that the amount paid is less than the fair value of the dissenter's interest in the limited liability company, or that the interest due is incorrectly calculated;

(b) The limited liability company fails to make payment within sixty days after the date set for demanding payment; or

(c) The limited liability company, having failed to effectuate the proposed merger, does not release the transfer restrictions imposed on members' interests as permitted by RCW 25.15.496 within sixty days after the date set for demanding payment.

(2) A dissenter waives the right to demand payment under this section unless the dissenter notifies the limited liability company of the dissenter's demand in writing under subsection (1) of this section within thirty days after the limited liability company made payment for the dissenter's interest in the limited liability company.

[ 2015 c 188 s 98.]